Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2498
Prescription drug donation program; approval; administration; participation; voluntary.

The department shall approve a prescription drug donation program that meets the criteria set forth in section 71-24,100 and designate a nonprofit organization to administer the program. Participation in the program shall be voluntary.

Laws 2024, LB1035, § 3.